District of Columbia statutes.
48-403

Mayor to propose rules; submission to Council; approval.

Within 90 days of February 28, 1987, the Mayor shall develop proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-210, § 4, 34 DCR 699

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-903.